Idaho, session 2026, H0784.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1639, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1639. DAILY RECESS AND UNSTRUCTURED ACTIVITY. (1) Each school dis-
trict, specially charted district, and public charter school shall provide
to students in kindergarten through grade 5 a period of daily recess out-
doors, guaranteeing every student time to move, play, and grow. Such recess
period shall occur daily and outdoors and shall be for not less than twenty
(20) minutes, weather and scheduling permitting. If weather does not permit
students to be outdoors, then daily recess shall be accommodated indoors,
such as in a gymnasium. Daily recess provided pursuant to this section shall
not be withheld for any disciplinary purposes.
(2) Each school district, specially charted district, and public char-
ter school is encouraged to provide to students in grades 6 through 8 daily
unstructured activity breaks.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.